Hawaii statutes.
[§457G-1.3] Powers and duties of the
director. In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law,
the director shall have the powers and duties to:

(1) Grant, deny, renew, refuse to renew, restore,
terminate, reinstate, condition, restrict, suspend, or revoke a license issued
pursuant to this chapter;

(2) Grant permission to a person to practice
occupational therapy and to use the title of "licensed occupational
therapist" or a description indicating that the person is a licensed
occupational therapist in this State;

(3) Grant permission to a person to practice as an
occupational therapy assistant and to use the title "licensed occupational
therapy assistant" or a description indicating that the person is a
licensed occupational therapy assistant in this State;

(4) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules pursuant to chapter
91 as the director finds necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(5) Administer, coordinate, and enforce this chapter;

(6) Discipline a licensed occupational therapist or
licensed occupational therapy assistant on grounds specified by this chapter or
chapter 436B or for any violation of rules adopted by the director pursuant to
this chapter;

(7) Refuse to license a person for failure to meet
the licensing requirements in this chapter or for any reason specified by this
chapter as grounds to discipline an occupational therapist or occupational
therapy assistant; and

(8) Appoint an advisory committee composed of
practicing occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants to
assist with the implementation of this chapter. [L 2014, c 209, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next